Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Nonresident Guardians

§ 93-13-181.
Appointment of nonresident guardian when ward’s property in this state [Repealed effective January 1, 2020].

When any ward resides out of this state, but has property, real or personal, in this state, and a guardian has been appointed to such ward in the state of his residence, such guardian shall be entitled to be appointed guardian of such nonresident ward by the chancery court of the county in this state in which such property, or any part thereof, is situated, upon producing to such court the original letters of guardianship issued to such nonresident guardian, or a certified copy thereof, duly authenticated, and upon executing bond with sureties as is required of other guardians.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 2005a; 1930, § 1906; 1942, § 443; Laws, 1918, ch. 236; Laws, 1972, ch. 408, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1972; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 16, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-13-183.
Non-resident guardian may sue in this state for ward’s property.

When any minor or person of unsound mind, shall reside out of this state, but has personal property, or is entitled to a legacy, or a distributive share of an estate being administered, or any debt or right of action, in this state, and a guardian has been appointed for such minor or person of unsound mind in the state or country of his residence, such guardian may sue in the courts of this state for, or may receive without suit, and give a valid receipt and acquittance for, such personal property, or legacy, or distributive share of an estate being administered as aforesaid, or may collect such debt or right in action, after filing in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county in this state where there may be some person indebted to such minor or person of unsound mind, or where any part of such personal property may be situated, or in which such estate may be administered a certified copy of the letters of guardianship issued to such non-resident guardian in the state or country where he was originally appointed, and a certificate of the officer before whom he is there liable to account as such guardian, that he is there liable to account for the thing sued for or received. When a certified copy of the letters of guardianship as aforesaid, and a certificate of the officer before whom such guardian is liable to account as aforesaid, shall be filed as aforesaid, it shall be conclusively presumed that the appointment and qualification of such guardian was in all respects valid and regular and lawful under the laws of the state and country where he was originally appointed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp, § 2005c; 1930, § 1908; 1942, § 445; Laws, 1918, ch. 236; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 16, eff from and after January 1, 2020.